Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,103
Income tax; due and unpaid; collection; lien foreclosure.

Any (1) tax due and unpaid under the provisions of the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, (2) interest, penalty, or addition to such tax, (3) tax, interest, penalty, or addition to such tax which has been erroneously refunded, and (4) deficiency shall constitute a debt to the State of Nebraska which may be collected by lien foreclosure or sued for and recovered in any proper form of action, in the name of the State of Nebraska, in the district court of the county wherein the taxpayer resides or owns property.

Laws 1967, c. 487, § 103, p. 1618.